Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-402.01
Consolidation agreement; hearing; notice.

The county board of each county proposing to enter into a consolidation agreement shall hold a public hearing on the agreement and shall give notice of the hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once each week for three consecutive weeks prior to the hearing. Final publication shall be within seven calendar days prior to the hearing. The notice shall describe the contents of the agreement and specify that a copy of the agreement may be obtained at no charge at the county clerk's office.

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 12.